Washington statutes.
RCW 15.130.120

Department's general powers.

(1) The department must do all acts and things necessary to carry out and enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(2) The department must adopt rules as necessary to implement the purpose and provisions of this chapter.

(a) To the extent feasible, the rules must promote uniformity with the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act, as amended, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq., and regulations adopted under it.

(b) To promote such uniformity, the department may conduct expedited rule making under chapter 34.05 RCW to adopt a subsequent version of a federal statute or regulation referenced in this chapter and adopt amendments to federal regulations that the department has previously adopted as rule.

(3) In accordance with subsection (2) of this section, the department may establish by rule:

(a) Standards for food including, but not limited to, identity, quality, and fill;

(b) Tolerance standards for any substance, including pesticides, color additives, and food additives used in or on food, but potentially harmful to humans or animals; and

(c) Uniform standards for pull date labeling and storage conditions for perishable packaged foods.

(4) The department must investigate violations or possible violations of this chapter or the rules adopted under it.

(5) The department may cooperate with and enter into agreements with other state, federal, or local governmental agencies in carrying out the purpose and provisions of this chapter.

(6) The department may notify the public about food safety issues and enforcement actions under this chapter.

(7) Rules that the department adopted under the authority of chapter 69.04 RCW remain effective until June 30, 2022, or until the department repeals or amends the rules, whichever is first.

[ 2018 c 236 s 103.]